Hawaii statutes.
§327K-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Form" means a provider orders for
life-sustaining treatment form adopted by the department.

"Health care provider" means an
individual licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to
provide health care in the ordinary course of the individual's business or
profession.

"Legally authorized representative"
means an agent, guardian, or surrogate, as those terms are defined in section
327E-2, or agent designated through a power of attorney for health care, as
defined in section 327E-2.

"Patient's provider" means a
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 453 or an advanced practice registered
nurse licensed pursuant to chapter 457 who has examined the patient.

"Provider orders for life-sustaining
treatment form" means a form signed by a patient, or if incapacitated, by
the patient's legally authorized representative and the patient's provider,
that records the patient's wishes and that directs a health care provider
regarding the provision of resuscitative and life-sustaining measures. A
provider orders for life-sustaining treatment form is not an advance
health-care directive. [L 2009, c 186, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 154, §3; am L
2015, c 35, §43]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next